Utah statutes.
58-75-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501 and as may be further defined by rule:

(1)  engaging in any act or practice in a professional capacity which the licensee is not competent to perform through training or experience;

(2)  failing to refer a client to other competent professionals when the licensee is unable or unwilling to adequately support or serve the client;

(3)  failing to maintain the confidentiality of any information received from a client, unless released by the client or otherwise authorized or required by law; and

(4)  exploiting a client for personal advantage, profit, or interest.

